District of Columbia statutes.
8-634.06

Civil penalties.

Pursuant to § 8-634.01, a person who:

(1)

Violates or fails to comply with an order of the Mayor, permit, or other applicable standard, requirement, regulation, or provisions of law pursuant to this chapter, shall be liable for:

(A)

Civil penalties not to exceed $10,000 for each day of noncompliance; and

(B)

An amount equal to 3 times the costs expended resulting from a failure to take proper action; and

(2)

Without sufficient cause, willfully violates, fails, or refuses to comply with an order of the Mayor, permit, or other applicable standard, requirement, regulation, or provisions of law pursuant to this chapter, shall be liable for:

(A)

Civil penalties not to exceed $25,000 for each day of noncompliance; and

(B)

An amount equal to 3 times the costs expended resulting from a failure to take proper action.

June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 406
as added Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-369, § 2(k), 58 DCR 996
This section is referenced in § 8-633.08.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(k) of Brownfield Revitalization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-667, December 28, 2010, 58 DCR 95).